Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:(1) Each month, the department must calculate the total sales tax revenues collected in the previous month pursuant to this chapter and notify the state treasurer.(2) The state treasurer shall transfer each month 20 percent of the amount in subsection (1) of this section to the local sales and use tax account created in RCW 82.14.050 .Sec. 2. RCW 82.14.050 and 2021 c 178 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, public transportation benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, regional transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit districts under chapter 36.73 RCW must contract, prior to the effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use tax, the administration and collection to the state department of revenue, which must deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is collected by the department of revenue must be deposited by the state department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby created in the state treasury. Beginning January 1, 2013, the department of revenue must make deposits in the local sales and use tax account on a monthly basis on the last business day of the month in which distributions required in (a) of this subsection are due. Moneys in the local sales and use tax account may be withdrawn only for:(a) Distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas, regional transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit districts imposing a sales and use tax; and(b) Making refunds of taxes imposed under the authority of this chapter and RCW 81.104.170 and exempted under RCW 82.08.962, 82.12.962, 82.08.02565, 82.12.02565, 82.08.025661, or 82.12.025661.(2) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended, insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, are applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter.(3) Counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, and regional transportation investment districts may not conduct independent sales or use tax audits of sellers registered under the streamlined sales tax agreement.(4) Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190 and subsection (5) of this section, all earnings of investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account must be credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas, regional transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit districts monthly.(5) Beginning January 1, 2013, the state treasurer must determine the amount of earnings on investments that would have been credited to the local sales and use tax account if the collections had been deposited in the account over the prior month. When distributions are made under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the state treasurer must transfer this amount from the state general fund to the local sales and use tax account and must distribute such sums to the counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas, regional transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit districts.(6) Repayment of deferred local sales and use taxes due under RCW 82.32.558 is subject to the requirements of RCW 82.32.559.(7) Beginning January 1, 2026, the state treasurer shall distribute the moneys transferred pursuant to section 1 of this act on a monthly basis. They must be distributed to each local taxing district imposing a local sales and use tax pursuant to chapter 82.14 RCW in the same proportion as the sales tax revenues in subsection (1) of this section for the same month of collections.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---